dictsource/en_rules
     C) w (_       w@
     C) w (X       U         // Welsh names
        wh         w
?2      wh         w#
        wr         r
     E) way (_S3   weI
     E) ways (_S4  weIz
     C) we (_      =wI
     _) were (P4t  w'e@
     C) west       w'Est
        we (w      wi:
        where      we@
?2      where      w#e@
        what       w02t
?2      what       w#02t
        which      wItS
?2      which      w#ItS
        who (_     hu:
        who (d     hu:
        who (m     hu:
        who (s     hu:
        wh (oC     h
        wh (orl    w
?2      wh (orl    w#
        wh (op     w
?2      wh (op     w#
     m) w (ich_ 
        wiki       wIki
     B) wing (_    wIN
     B) wing (s_   wIN
     @) wise (_S4  waIz
     e) with (_    w'ID
        with (C    w%ID
        with (dr   w%IT
        with (A    w%ID
        with (e    wID
     &) wood (_S4  wUd
     s) wor (d     o@
    ss) wor (d     w3:
?5  ss) wor (d     wVR
     &) work (_S4  w3:k
        wor (th_   w3:
?5      wor (th_   wVR
     &) worthy (_S6 w3:Di
    As) w (ick 

.group x
        x          ks
        xx         ks
     _) xy         zaI
     _) x (Y       z
     c) x (_       Eks       // ? filetypes
     t) x (_       Eks
    eu) x (_
     _) xeno (@    zEnoU
        xio (n     kS@
        xious      =kS@s
        xas (_     =ks@s
        xis (_     =ksIs
        xus (_     =ks@s
        xu (a      =kSu:
    lu) xu (r      gZU@
        xure (_    kS%U@

.group y
     -) y (-       @         // Welsh names
        y          j
     _) y' (CP2    j@
     _) y's (_     waIz
        y (_$w_alt1++ aI
        y (C_      I
        y (CC      I
   XoB) y (@+      I
     X) y ($w_alt6+ aI
     _) y (C@      I
     _) y (n@      V
     _) y (s@      V
   &Ck) y (_S1     i
    &C) y (abl     I2
        y (C       I
     C) y          %I
        y (ar      j
        y (Be#     aI
    @C) y (Be#     aI
    %C) y (Be      i
        ye (_      aI
        y (ear     j
    %B) y (_NS1d   i
    %B) y (_S1d    I
    _C) y (Ce      aI
     C) y (i       I
    &C) y (en_     =I
        y (iC_     j
    sf) y (_       aI
    Cf) y (_       i
   %Af) y (_       i
    _C) y          aI
    _C) y (ph      aI
        y (st      I
    XC) y          aI
    CC) y (n_      I
        y (na_     'i:
   _sC) y          aI
   @st) y (list    ,aI
    _b) y (+       aI
        y (cin_    'aI
     c) y (cl      aI
     c) y (clic_   aI
   bic) y (cl      I
  ereb) y (_       aI
  earb) y (_       aI
     h) y (Cr      aI
     C) yin (_S2   In          
     c) y (lin     I
     c) y (r       I
     @) yr (d_     3:
     w) yr (m      3:
     w) yr (B      i@
    th) y (l_      aI
    fl) y          aI
    fl) y (n       I
    gl) y (ph      I
     k) y (l_      aI
     n) y (l_      aI
     t) y (l_      aI
    &C) y (lene_   =I
        y (lum     aI
        yang       j'A#N      // chinese names
     d) ynam       aInam
    @C) y (mAn_    I
     w) y (n       I
    gl) y (cer     I
     d) yse (n     Is@
     f) y (_       aI
    ff) y (_       i
   &sk) y (_       =i
   den) y (_       aI
   bel) y (_       aI
     &) y (_       %i
     &) y (_N      %i
        y (_       aI
        y (Cic_    'I
        y (Cical   'I
        y (Cify    'I
    _s) y          I
     @) y (ra_     'aI
     s) yring      I2rIndZ
        yse (_+    aIz
        ysing (_   aIzI2N
        ysed (_    aIzd
        yzed (_    aIzd
     &) ysis (_    =@sIs
        yte (_     aIt
        you'       %ju:
        yu (@      ju:
        yu (C%     jV
        yeo (C     joU
        y (er_     aI
     C) yes (_     aIz
     _) yes        jEs
        yeah       jEh
        yew        ju:
    @C) y (gen     I
        yhr        i@
?!3  d) y (nas     I
     s) ynch       Ink
     t) yg (e+     aIg
     t) y (pist    aI
     t) y (pic     I
     t) y (p_      aI
        y (pal     'aI
     h) ypocri (t  Ip@krI
     h) y (pocr    %I
     t) y (rann    I
    ph) ys (i      Iz
        yr (_      3
        yre (_     aI3
     c) y (ni      I
     l) y (ri      I
     p) y (ra      I
     p) y (ri      I
     p) y (rit     aI
     p) y (th      aI
        y (the_    aI
    st) y (re      aI
     C) yx (_      Iks
     t) yone (_    Iw'02n
     t) ytwo (_    It'u:
     t) yfour (_   If'o@
     t) yfive (_   If'aIv
     t) yseven (_  Is'Ev@n
     t) yeight (_  I'eIt

.group z
        z          z
     _) z's (_     zEdz
?3   _) z's (_     zi:z
        z (z 
     _) zh (Y      Z
     _) z (lot     z
     _) zs (Y      z
     _) z (wY      z

     a) zz (o      ts
     n) z (_N      ts

     @) zales (_   z'A:l@s
        zei        zaI
        zes (_     zI#z
        zh         Z
        zu (_      =zu:
        zue        zw'eI
        zure       Z3
        zo (olo    zu:

.group E
        E                    // silent 'e' , ignore by default
        E (B_      @
        E (BC_     @
        E (BCe_    @
        E (Cia     'i:
        Ea (_      =i@
        Ea (n_     'i@
     d) Ea (n_     =i|@
        Ectomy (_S6 'Ekt@mI
    @@) Ed (_S2vei d#
    &C) Ed (_S2veim d#
        Ed (_+$w_alt1 Ed
    &d) Ed (_S2vei I#d
 &@@om) Ed (_S2v   d#
    &t) Ed (_S2vei I#d
    ur) Ed (_S1vi  d#
    &x) Ed (_S2v   d#
     y) Ed (_      d#
        Edly (_S4e Idl%i
        E (dia_    i:
        E (dic_    i:
   nak) E (d       I
        Ee (d      i:
        EE (_      i:
        Ee (_      i:
        Eer (_     'i@3
        Eh (K      eI
        Ei (n_     i:
        Ei (_      aI
        E  (st_    I

        El (_      @L
?8      El (_      El
        Ele (_     @L
        Ell (+     @L
        Ella (_    'El@
        Elle (_    'El
        Elli (_S4  'ElI

        Em (_      @m
     @) E (mber    'E
        Eme (_     i:m
        Em (ic_    'i:m
        Ensk (_    'Ensk
        En (_      @n
?8      En (_      En
        En (atA    @n
        En (dA_    'En
        E (ndous   E
        Ener (_    @n@
        Ening (_   @nI2N
?8      Ening (_   EnI2N
        Ene (_     i:n
        Ened (_S2  d
        En (g      @n
        E (nC      @
        E (ning    E
        E (nizA    @
        E (nti     'E
        E (ntu     'E
        E (ntous   'E
        E (o_      I2
        Eous (_    =i@s
     l) E (ps      E
     l) E (pt      E
     c) E (p_      E
        Er (B_     3:
        Eri (A     'i@rI2
        Er (ie_    @r
        Er (ic_    Er
        Er (ous_   @r
        Er (_      3
    ad) Er (_S1    3
    ad) Ers (_S2   3z
        Er (C      3
        Ery (_     @ri
        E (x_      E
  tric) Es (_S2e   i:z
     &) Es (_S2e   z
     c) Es (_S2e   %I#z
     c) E's (_S3e  %I#z
     f) Es (_S2e   z#
     g) Es (_S2e   %I#z
    ch) Es (_S2e   %I#z
    ph) Es (_S2e   %I#z
     k) Es (_S2e   z#
     p) Es (_S2e   z#
     s) Es (_S2e   %I#z
     s) E's (_S2e  %I#z
    sh) Es (_S2e   %I#z
     t) Es (_S2e   z#
     x) Es (_S2    %I#z
    Cr) Es (_S2e   @z
        Ese (_     'i:z
        E (sia     'i:
        Esque      'Esk
        E (ss      E
        Ess (_     Es
        Esta (_    'Est@
        E (te_     i:
        Etry (_S2  ri
        E (tric    E
        Etta (_    'Et@
        Ette (_    'Et
        E (tic_    E
        Eum (_     i:@m
        Eus (_     i@s
        Ew (_      u:
        E (z_      E


.group '
        's (_S2m   z
     f) 's (_S2m   s
     p) 's (_S2m   s
     t) 's (_S2m   s
     k) 's (_S2m   s
    se) 's (_S2m   %I#z
     s) 's (_S2m   %I#z
    ce) 's (_S2m   %I#z
    ch) 's (_S2m   %z/2
   och) 's (_S2m   s
    sh) 's (_S2m   %I#z
     x) 's (_S2m   %I#z
     z) 's (_S2m   %I#z
    6_) 's (_      %I#z
   16_) 's (_      z
        're (_S3   3
        've (_S3   @v
        'd (_S2    d
        'll (_S3   @L

// Shavian characters, phonemic alphabet for English
.group 0xF0
// 0xF0 is the first byte of the utf-8 code for these characters

    𐑐     p
    𐑚     b
    𐑑     t
    𐑛     d
    𐑒     k
    𐑜     g
    𐑓     f
    𐑝     v
    𐑔     T
    𐑞     D
    𐑕     s
    𐑟     z
    𐑖     S
    𐑠     Z
    𐑗     tS
    𐑡     dZ
    𐑘     j
    𐑢     w
    𐑙     N
    𐑣     h
    𐑤     l
    𐑮     r
    𐑥     m
    𐑯     n
    𐑦     I
    𐑦 (_  %i
    𐑰     i:
    𐑧     E
    𐑱     eI
    𐑨     a
    𐑲     aI
    𐑩     @
    𐑳     V
    𐑪     0
    𐑴     oU
    𐑫     U
    𐑵     u:
    𐑬     aU
    𐑶     OI
    𐑭     A:
    𐑷     O:
    𐑸     'A@
    𐑹     'O@
    𐑺     'e@
    𐑻     '3:
    𐑼     3
    𐑽     'i@3
    𐑾     i:@
    𐑿     ju:

.group 0xce   // Greek letters

        α          'alf@_
        β          b'i:t@_
?3      β          b'eIt@_
        γ          g'am@_
        δ          d'Elt@_
        ε          'EpsIl0n_
        ζ          z'i:t@_
        η          'i:t@_
        θ          T'i:t@_
        ι          aI'oUt@_
        κ          k'ap@_
        λ          l'amd@_
        μ          m'ju:_
        ν          n'ju:_
        ξ          ks'aI_
        ο          'oUmIkr0n_

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

        π          p'aI_
        ρ          r'oU_
        σ          s'Igm@_
        ς          s'Igm@_
        τ          t'aU_
        υ          'UpsIl0n_
        φ          f'aI_
        χ          tS'aI_
        ψ          ps'aI_
        ω          'oUmIg@_
?3      ω          oUm'eIg@_


// default group for "non of the above"

.group

// non-ascii characters with specified pronunciations
// List the accented characters in en_list with the $accent attribute
        á (X       'A:
        à          a
        é          eI
        é (X       'eI
        é (CA_     'eI
     _) é          %I
        ée         i:
        ée (_      'eI
        ê          e@
        ä          E
        ë          E
        ï          i:
        ó (n       '0
        ö          3:
        ör         3:
        ü          u:
        û          u:
        ç          s
        ß          s
        č          tS
        š          S
        ş          S
        ž          Z
        þ          T
        ð          D
	ñ          nj

     _) ʻ (A       ?         // arabic

' 
        !          _:Ekskl@meIS@n_:
        ! (\! 
        :          koUl@n
    D_) : (_DD_              // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
        $          d0l3
        !=         n0ti:kw@Lz
        >=         greIt3O@i:kw@L
        <=         lEsO@i:kw@L


    __) - (_D      maIn@s
    D_) - (_D      daS
     _) - (_D      _


        .          d0t
        . (.       _:
    \.) . 
